Washington statutes.
RCW 17.12.060

Supervision of the district.

The agricultural expert in counties having an agricultural expert, shall under the direction of Washington State University have general supervision of the methods and means of preventing, destroying, or exterminating any animals or rodents as herein mentioned within his or her county, and of how the funds of any pest district shall be expended to best accomplish the purposes for which such funds were raised; in counties having no such agricultural expert each county commissioner shall be within his or her respective commissioner district, ex officio supervisor, or the board may designate some such person to so act, and shall fix his or her compensation therefor. Whenever any member of the board shall act as supervisor he or she shall be entitled to his or her actual expenses and his or her per diem as county commissioner the same as if he or she were doing other county business.

[ 2011 c 336 s 458; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 4; 1919 c 152 s 6; RRS s 2806.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The law authorizing the employment of agricultural experts was 1913 c 18 as amended by 1919 c 193 but since repealed by 1949 c 181 which authorizes cooperative extension work in agriculture and home economics. See RCW 36.50.010.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.